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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−251

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1242 / 42 IG2 Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1242 / 42
With the vehicle running, open circuit in IG2 is detected for
more than 7 sec.

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbatteryvoltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK

2 Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thevoltageconditionoutput fromtheECUdisplayedon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
Remove skid control ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals IG2 and GND of skid

control ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
skid control ECU.

NG
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3 Check continuity between terminal GND of skid control ECU connector and body
ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal GND of skid control ECU
connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 � or less

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between skid control ECU and battery (See page
IN−38).


